Hawaii statutes.
§101-14 Plaintiff. The attorney
general of the State may, at the request of the head of any department of the
State, or as otherwise provided by law, institute proceedings for the
condemnation of property as provided for in this part. Any county may institute
proceedings in the name and on behalf of the county for the condemnation of
property within the county for any of the purposes provided in this part which
are within the powers granted to the county. [L 1896, c 45, §4; am L 1917, c
108, §2; RL 1925, §816; RL 1935, §58; RL 1945, §309; am L 1947, c 200, §1(b);
am L 1951, c 12, §1(i); RL 1955, §8-12; HRS §101-14]

Cross References

Hawaiian homes commission may institute proceedings in own
name, see HHCA §221.

Case Notes

Proceeding by Territory to be in name of Territory. 20 H.
365.

Legislative delegation of authority to determine necessity of
taking implied. 43 H. 253.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next